Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,235
Renewable energy tax credit; when available; Department of Revenue; powers.

(1) Beginning on or after July 14, 2006, and before July 1, 2026, any producer of electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility shall earn a renewable energy tax credit. For electricity generated on or after July 14, 2006, and before October 1, 2007, the credit shall be .075 cent for each kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. For electricity generated on or after October 1, 2007, and before January 1, 2010, the credit shall be .1 cent for each kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. For electricity generated on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2013, the credit shall be .075 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. For electricity generated on or after January 1, 2013, and before July 1, 2026, the credit shall be .05 cent per kilowatt-hour for electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. The credit may be earned for production of electricity for ten years after the date that the facility is placed in operation on or after July 14, 2006.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility means electricity that is exclusively produced by a new renewable electric generation facility;

(b) Eligible renewable resources means wind, moving water, solar, geothermal, fuel cell, methane gas, or photovoltaic technology; and

(c) New renewable electric generation facility means an electrical generating facility located in this state that is first placed into service on or after July 14, 2006, which utilizes eligible renewable resources as its fuel source.

(3) The credit allowed under this section may be used to reduce the producer's Nebraska income tax liability or to obtain a refund of state sales and use taxes paid by the producer of electricity generated by a new renewable electric generation facility. A claim to use the credit for refund of the state sales and use taxes paid, either directly or indirectly, by the producer may be filed quarterly for electricity generated during the previous quarter by the twentieth day of the month following the end of the calendar quarter. The credit may be used to obtain a refund of state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter immediately preceding the quarter in which the claim for refund is made, except that the amount refunded under this subsection shall not exceed the amount of the state sales and use taxes paid during the quarter.

(4) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to permit verification of the validity and timeliness of any renewable energy tax credit claimed.

(5) The total amount of renewable energy tax credits that may be used by all taxpayers shall be limited to fifty thousand dollars without further authorization from the Legislature.

(6) The credit allowed under this section may not be claimed by a producer who received a sales tax exemption under section 77-2704.57, as such section existed on June 30, 2026, for the new renewable electric generation facility.

(7) Interest shall not be allowed on any refund paid under this section.

Laws 2006, LB 872, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB367, § 24;

Laws 2011, LB360, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB261, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 28.
July 1, 2026